Alabama, session 2026rs, HB658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) There is levied in Macon County a
privilege tax of eight percent of the net gambling revenue
collected from pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse racing
on computerized machines of a race track licensee. The tax
shall be collected by the Macon County Racing Commission from
each historical horse racing licensee and distributed as
provided by local law.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), "net gambling
revenue" means the total amount of money or value in any form
received as a result of any pari-mutuel wagering on historical
horse racing activities in Macon County, excluding free bets,
free plays, and promotional credits, less federal excise
taxes, voided wagers, and the total money or value in any form
paid as prizes or winnings.
(c) The local privilege tax collected by the Macon
County Racing Commission under this section is exclusive of
Page 1

County Racing Commission under this section is exclusive of
HB658 INTRODUCED
and supersedes any other local taxes, fees, or commissions now
imposed on historical horse racing pari-mutuel activities in
the county including, but not limited to, the tax imposed
pursuant to Section 45-44-150.12, Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Nothing in this section shall change the existing
tax structure contained in Section 45-44-150.12, Code of
Alabama 1975, for live greyhound and thoroughbred racing, as
well as simulcast live greyhound and thoroughbred racing in
Macon County which is not historical horse racing.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize, permit, or expand any form of gambling activity
beyond that which is permitted by law on the effective date of
this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on the first
day of the second month following its passage and approval by
the Governor or its otherwise becoming law.
Page 2